I'm so glad!
'But you are not well or sad,' he continued, without letting out her hands and bent over her. 'What were you thinking?
'All about one thing,' she said with a smile.
She was telling the truth.
Whenever, at any moment, she was asked what she was thinking, she could answer without mistake: one, her happiness, and her misfortune.
She was thinking now that he caught her, that's what she was thinking, why for others, for Betsy, for example (she knew her hidden connection to Tuskevich), it was easy, and it was so painful for her?
Today, this thought, for some reasons, has particularly tormented her.
She asked him about the races.
He answered her and, seeing that she was excited, trying to entertain her, began to tell her the simplest tone of the race preparations.
"Say or not? 'I thought she looked into his calm, gentle eyes.' 'He is so happy, so busy racing; that he will not understand it properly, he will not understand all the significance to us of this event.'
'But you didn't tell me what you were thinking when I came in,' he said, interrupting your story, 'please tell me!'
She wouldn't answer and leaning her head down a little, staring down at him with her shiny eyelashes.
Her hand, playing with a ripped leaf, was shaking.
He saw it, and his face expressed the submission, the slave devotion that so bribed her.
'I see that something has happened.'
Can I be calm for a minute knowing that you have a grief I don't share?
Tell me for God's sake!
"Yeah, I won't forgive him if he doesn't understand the meaning of it.
Why don't you tell me why?" 'I thought, still looking at him and feeling that her hand was shaking more and more with the leaf.'
'For God's sake!' he repeated, taking her hand.
'Tell me?
'Yes, yes, yes...'
'I am pregnant,' she said, quietly and slowly.
The leaf in her hand trembled even more, but she kept an eye on him to see him take it.
He turned pale, wanted to say something, but stopped, released her hand and lowered his head.
"Yes, he understood the meaning of this event," she thought, and shook his hand gratefully.
But she was wrong that he understood the meaning of the news the way she, a woman, understood it.
But he realized that the crisis he wanted would come now, that it was no longer possible to hide from his husband, and that it was rather an unnatural situation that needed to be broken in one way or another.
But in addition, her anxiety was physically communicated to him.
He looked at her with a humble, humble look, kissed her hand, stood up and walked on the terrace silently.
'Yes,' he said, speaking with determination. 'Neither I nor you looked at our relationship as a toy, and now our fate has been resolved.'
It is necessary to come to an end,' he said, looking back -- the lie in which we live.
'To finish?'
How can I end it, Alexei? 'She said quietly.'
She calmed down now, and her face glowed with a soft smile.
'Leave our husband and unite our lives.'
'It is connected and so,' she answered a little bit.
'Yes, but not at all, not at all.
'But how, Alexei, teach me how? 'She said with a sad mockery of the insolence of her position. 'Is there a way out of this situation?
Aren't I my husband's wife?
'There is a way out of every situation.
We have to make up our minds,' he said. 'It is better than the situation you live in.
I can see how you're tormented by everything, by the light, by the son, by the husband.
'Oh, not husband,' she said, laughingly. 'I don't know, I don't think about him.
He's gone.
'You speak incorruptibly.
I know you.
You're tormenting him too.
'He doesn't even know,' she said, and suddenly the bright paint appeared on her face; the cheeks, the forehead, her neck turned red, and the tears of shame appeared upon her eyes. 'And let's not talk about him.
He has tried several times, albeit not as decisively as he is now, to bring her into the discussion of his situation and has faced each time with the superficiality and ease of judgment with which she has now met his challenge.
As if there was something about it that she couldn't or didn't want to understand, as if, as soon as she started talking about it, she, the real Anna, went out and performed, another strange, strange woman, who he didn't love and fear and who stood up to him.
But now he's decided to say everything.
'Whether he knows or not,' he said with his usual firm and calm tone, 'if he knows or not, we don't care.
We can't... you can't stay like this, especially now.
'What do you think I should do?' 'She asked with the same simple ridicule.'
She, who was so afraid that he wouldn't accept her pregnancy easily, was now disappointed that he had to do something about it.
'Tell him everything and leave him.
'Very well; let's say that I will do it,' she said. 'Do you know what's going to happen?
I'm gonna tell you everything, and the evil light lit in her in a minute in front of those gentle eyes. 'Ah, do you love someone else and have a criminal connection with him?' (She, representing her husband, did, just like Alexis Alexandrovich did, a slap on the word of crime.)
I warned you of the consequences of religious, civil and family relations.
You didn't listen to me. Now I can't give my name to shame... and my son,' she wanted to say, but she couldn't joke with her son... 'a shame with her name,' and something like that, she added. 'In fact, he will speak with his state manner, and with clarity and precision, that he cannot let me go, but will take measures that depend on him to stop the scandal.
And he'll do what he says, carefully.
Here's what's gonna happen.
It's not a man, it's a machine, and an angry car when it gets angry,' she added, remembering him with all the details of his figure, the manner of speaking and his character, and blaming him for everything she could find in him, not forgiving him of anything for the terrible guilt she was responsible for.
'But, Anna,' he said with a strong, soft voice, trying to calm her, 'it is necessary to tell him, and then to guide what he will do.
'Well, run?'
'Why not run?'
I don't see a way to go on with this.
And not for yourself,' I see that you are suffering.
'Yes, run, and I shall be your mistress?' 'She said evilly.'
'Anna! 'He spoke in a short and gentle manner.'
'Yes,' she continued, 'to become your mistress and to destroy everything...
She wanted to say son again, but she couldn't speak that word.
He could not understand how she, with her strong, honest nature, could bear this position of deception and would not want to leave it; but he did not know that the main reason for it was the word of the son, whom she could not speak.
When she thought of her son and his future relationship with her mother's father, she was so scared that she did what she did, that she didn't reason, but, as a woman, tried only to calm herself with false reasoning and words, so that everything would remain the same and that the terrible question of what would happen to her son could be forgotten.
'I beg you, I beg you,' she said in a very different, sincere and gentle tone, holding his hand, and never speak to me about it!
'But Anna...
'Never.
Leave it to me.
All the low ground, all the horror of my position, but it's not as easy to decide as you think.
And leave it to me, and obey me.
Don't ever talk to me about it.
Do you promise me?
No, no, promise!
'I promise you everything, but I can't be calm, especially after what you said.
I can't be calm when you can't be calm...
'I!' she repeated. 'Yes, I suffer sometimes; but it will pass if you never talk to me about it.
When you talk to me about it, it's the only thing that hurts me.
'I don't understand,' he said.
'I know,' she interrupted him, 'how hard it is for your honest nature to lie, and I pity you.
I often wonder how you ruined your life for me.
'I thought the same thing now,' he said, 'how could you sacrifice everything because of me?
I can't forgive myself for being unhappy.
'Am I unhappy?' 'She said, drawing near to him, and looking at him with an enthralled smile of love,' I said, 'as a hungry man who was given to eat.
Maybe he's cold, and his dress is torn, and he's ashamed, but he's not happy.
Am I unhappy?
No, here's my happiness...
She heard the voice of the returning son and stood up with a quick look at the terrace.
Her eyes lit up with a fire familiar to him, she raised her beautiful, ringed hands quickly, took his head, looked at him with a long look, and drew her face close with open, smiling lips, kissed his mouth and both eyes, and pushed away.
She wanted to go, but he held her.
'When? 'He whispered, looking at her with joy.'
'Now, at one o'clock,' she whispered and, with a heavy sigh, took her light and swift step towards her son.
Serezha found it raining in a big garden, and she and the nanny sat in a gazebo.
'Well, goodbye,' she said. 'Now we must go to the races soon.
Betsy promised to pick me up.
When he looked at the watch, he left in haste.
When he looked at the watch on the Kareni balcony, he was so anxious and busy with his thoughts that he saw the shooters on the dial, but couldn't figure out what time it was.
He went out on the highway and headed out, carefully walking through the dirt, towards his wheelchair.
He was so full of feelings for Anna that he didn't think about what time it was and whether he still had time to go to Bryansky.
He had, as is often the case, only the external memory, indicating what was then decided to do.
He came up to his doll, who was lying on a goat's head in the shadow of a thick lip, admired the rolling poles of the fly-throwers over the dense horses, and when he woke up the punter, he jumped into the wheelchair and told him to go to Bryansky.
It was only when he drove off at number seven that he remembered so much that he looked at the clock and realized that it was half past six and that he was late.
On that day, there were a few races: the race of the convoy, then the double-track officer, the quadruple officer, and the race in which he raced.
He could be on time for his race, but if he goes to Bryansky, that's the only way he's gonna be here, and he's gonna be there when the yard is all over.
That wasn't good.
But he gave the Bryanian word to be with him, so he decided to move on, ordering the coach not to regret the three.
He came to see Bryansky, stayed at his place for five minutes and bounced back.
That quick drive calmed him down.
All the hard things that he had in his relationship with Anna, all the uncertainty that remained after their conversation, came out of his head; he now thought with pleasure and excitement about the race, about the fact that he was going to catch up, and sometimes waiting for the happiness of this night's date was a bright light in his imagination.
The feeling of the upcoming race was becoming more and more intense as he moved further and further into the racing atmosphere, overtaking the crews from the road and from Petersburg to the races.
There was no one at home in his apartment; everyone was at the races, and his footmen waited at the gate.
While he was changing his clothes, the footman told him that the second race had already begun, that many gentlemen had come to ask about him and that the boy had used the stable twice.
After changing his clothes without haste (he never rushed or lost his self - control), he told him to go to the barracks.
He had already seen from the barracks a sea of crews, pedestrians, soldiers surrounding the hippodrome, and baking gazebos.
It was probably the second race, 'cause while he was walking into the barn, he heard a call.
As he approached the stables, he met a white redhead by Gladiator Mahotin, who was led to the hippodrome in orange with a blue pond, with seemingly huge blue ears.
'Where's Cord? 'He asked the stable boy.'
'In the stables, sitting.
Fru-Fru was already sedentary in the open day.
They were gonna take her out.
'Are you late?'
'All right! All right!
It's all right, it's all right,' said the Englishman, 'Don't be excited.
Once again he looked at the lovely, loving shapes of a horse trembling the whole body, and with the difficulty of breaking away from the sight, he left the barracks.
He drove up to the gazebos at the best possible time to avoid paying attention to himself.
A double-track race just ended, and all eyes were set on a cavalry-garde in front and a leib-gusar in the back, from the last forces of the horse chasers who approached the pole.
From the middle and the outside of the circle, everyone was drawn to the pillar, and a cavalry group of soldiers and officers expressed the joy of their officer &apos; s and comrade &apos; s expected celebration.
In the middle of the crowd almost at the same time as the call was made to finish the race, and the tall, mud - splashed cavalierard, who came first, fell down on the saddle, began to let down the leash to his grey, sweat - dark, hard - breathing stallion.
The stud, with his feet poking at his feet, shortened his large body's rapid motion, and the Cavalergard officer, like a man who woke up from a heavy sleep, looked round and smiled with difficulty.
A crowd of people and strangers surrounded him.
He deliberately avoided the chosen, great - lighting crowd, which moved with restraint and freedom and talked in front of the gazebos.
He found out that there was both Karenna and Betsy and his brother's wife, and deliberately, not to have fun, he didn't approach them.
But a number of acquaintances stopped him by telling him the details of his former races and asking him why he was late.
While the jockeys were called to the gazebo and all turned to the prizes, the eldest brother of Vronski, Alexander, the colonel with the exelbants, the low height, the same as Alexei, but more handsome and brown, with a red nose and a drunken, open face, approached him.
'Did you get my note? 'He said.' 'You will never be found.
Alexander Vronsky, despite the rugged, especially drunken, life by which he was known, was quite a courtman.
Now, speaking to his brother about a very unpleasant thing for him, knowing that the eyes of many could be pointed at them, he looked smiling as if he were joking with his brother.
'I've got it and, right, I don't know what you care about,' said Alexei.
'I care that I have now been seen, that you are not here, and that you were met at Peterhof on Monday.
'There are cases to be discussed only by those who have a direct interest in them, and the case that you care so much about is...'
'Yes, but then they don't serve, not...'
'I ask you not to interfere, that's all.
Alexei's frowny face paled, and his outstanding lower jaw shuddered, which rarely happened to him.
As a man with a very kind heart, he was rarely angry, but when he was angry and his chin shivered, he was dangerous, as Alexander Wronsky knew.
Alexander Wronsky smiled funny.
'I just wanted to deliver my mother's letter.
Answer her and don't get upset before you drive.
Bonne chance,' he added, smiling, and walked away from him.
But after him again, the friendly greeting stopped Wronski.
'You don't want to know your buddies!
Hello, Mon cher! 'Stepan Arkadič spoke, and here, among this Peterburg glitter, no less than in Moscow, blazing with his blazing face and burrowing buckenbards. 'I came yesterday, and I am very glad to see you celebrate.
When will I see you?
'Come into the artery tomorrow,' he said, 'and after shaking it, apologizing for the sleeve of the coat, went to the middle of the hippodrome, where the horses had already been introduced for the big race with obstacles.
The sweaty, worn-out horse racing with the stables went home, and one after another came new to the upcoming race, fresh, the larger part of the English horse, in the caporas, with their curled bellies, which looked like weird giant birds.
To the right was toast to the beautiful Fru-Fru, who, as in the springs, had crossed her elastic and rather long moneys.
It wasn't far from her that she was taken from a gladiator's loaf.
The big, lovely, perfectly right shapes of a stallion with a lovely butt and unusually short, over the hoofs of the women who sat down, were reluctant to pay attention to him.
He wanted to approach his horse, but he was detained again by a friend.
'Oh, here's Karenin!' said a friend he spoke to. 'Cause she's looking for a wife, and she's in the middle of a gazebo.
Didn't you see her?
'No, I didn't,' he replied, and without looking back at the gazebo in which he had been pointed at Karenina, he approached his horse.
Didn't have time to see the saddle that had to be ordered, as the jumpers were called to the gazebo to remove the numers and send--
With serious, strict, many with pale faces, 17 officers joined the gazebo and removed the number.
Wronsky got the seventh number.
I heard, "Sit down!"
Feeling that he, along with other jumpers, was forming a center on which all his eyes were set in motion, Wronsky, in a tense state in which he was usually slow and calm in his movements, approached his horse.
Cord to celebrate the races dressed in his front suit: a black tucked-up suit, tight-up collars, sticking his cheeks in, and a round black hat and botforts.
He was as calm and important as ever and held a horse for both reasons standing before her.
Fru-Fru continued to trembling like a fever.
The full fire of her eyes touched the one that was right for Vronski.
Wronsky put his finger under the edge.
The horse moved harder, rolled around and pressed her ear.
An Englishman wrinkled his lips, wishing to express a smile over believing his saddle.
'Sit down, you will be less concerned...'
Wronski looked back at his rivals for the last time.
He knew he wouldn't see them on the train anymore.
Two of them were already on their way to where they were supposed to go.
Galcin, one of the dangerous rivals and a friend of Vronsky's, was circling around a rotten stallion who wouldn't let him sit down.
The little leib gusar in the narrow rheutuses was driving a gallop, bent like a cat on a croup, out of a desire to imitate the English.
Prince Kuzovlev sat pale on his blood factory, the Grabian factory, a mare, and an Englishman led her to the woods.
Vronsky and all his comrades knew Kuzovlev and his specialty of "weak" nerves and awful egoism.
They knew that he was afraid of everything, that he was afraid to ride the front horse; but now, precisely because it was scary, because people were breaking their necks, and that every obstacle had a doctor, an infirmary forelock, with a broken cross and a sister of mercy, he decided to ride.
They met with their eyes, and he winked sweetly at him.
He's the only one he hasn't seen, the main rival, Mahotin on Gladiator.
'Don't rush,' said Cord to Vronsky, 'and remember one thing: Don't stop at the obstacles and don't send them, let her choose what she wants.
'All right, all right,' he said, taking the lead.
'If possible, race; but do not despair until the last minute if you are from behind.'
The horse did not have time to move, as he became a flexible and strong movement into a steel, serrated drive, and easily, firmly placed his broken body on the squeaking skin of the saddle.
By taking his right foot in pursuit, he used a common gesture to equalize the double strings between his fingers, and Cord put his hands on it.
It's like not knowing how to walk before, Fru-Fru, pulling out a long neck of leash, touching like a spring, shaking a sedica on her flexible back.
Cord followed him in his steps.
The anxious horse on that side, and on the other hand, in an effort to deceive the sedox, drew out the leash, and he tried, in vain, with his voice and with his hand, to calm her down.
They were already approaching the springed river, heading for the place where they were to be sent.
Many of the jumpers were in the front, many in the back, as he suddenly heard the sound of the horse's halo from behind him, and he was overrun by Mahotin on his white, gladiator's elbow.
Mahotin smiled at his long teeth, but he looked angry at him.
He didn't love him at all, now he thought he was the most dangerous rival, and he was upset that he was passing by, heating up his horse.
Fru-Fru boiled her left leg on a gallop and made two jumps and, angry with the tights, moved on to a trembling rat that boiled the sedoc.
Cord frowned, too, and almost ran in pursuit of Vronski.
Seventeen people jumped all the officers.
The races were to take place in a large quadruple elliptical circle in front of the gazebo.
There were nine obstacles in this circle: a river, large, two arches, a deaf barrier in front of the gazebo itself, a ditch of dry, a ditch with water, a cosogor, an Irish trench consisting of (one of the most difficult obstacles) of a moal, hidden wood, followed by a ditch, which was not seen as a horse, so the horse had to jump both obstacles or kill itself; then two other ditches with water and one dry one -- and the end of the race was against the gazebo.
But the races started not from a circle, but from a hundred to a distance, and at that distance there was the first obstacle -- a springed river into three arches of width, which at random could jump or move the raft.
Three trips were straightened out, but each time a horse came out, and I had to stop by again.
The launcher, Colonel Cestrin, started to get angry when he finally cried out for the fourth time, "Come on!" --and the rides were touched.
All the eyes, all the binoculars were turned to a bunch of horsemen while they were leveled.
"Let it go!
They're jumping!" &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt;I heard from all sides after the silence of waiting. &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt;
And piles and lonely pedestrians started running from place to place to see better.
At the first minute, a assembled bunch of riders stretched out, and it looked like they were two, three and one at a time, approaching the river...
For the audience, it seemed that they all went together; but for the riders, there were seconds of difference that mattered to them.
Worried and too nervous Fru-Fru lost the first moment, and several horses took it from its place before it, but, before the rivers had yet to reach the river, Wronsky, with all her strength in holding the horse in the leash, went through three easily, and only the red gladiator of Mahotin was left, who had smashed his butt in front of the Vronski himself, and the adorable Diana, who was not dead or alive.
In the first few minutes, he had not yet owned himself or a horse.
He couldn't control the horse's movements until the first obstacle, the rivers.
The gladiator and Diana came together and almost at the same moment: once, climbed over the river and flew to the other side; quietly, as if by flying, Fru-Fru followed them, but at the same time as Vronski felt in the air, he suddenly saw, almost under the feet of his horse, Kuzovlev, who was racing with Diana on the other side of the river (the Cuzovljev had given guidance after jumping, and the horse flew over his head with him).
The details of these things were discovered after, but now he's only seen what's right under Fru-Froux's feet or Diana's head could hit.
But Fru-Fru, like a fallen cat, made an effort on the jump with her legs and her back and, passing the horse, moved on.
"Oh, honey!" 'Cause he thought.
After the Vronski River, he mastered the horse well and began to hold it, intending to cross the big barrier behind Mahotin and already at the next, impenetrable distance of two hundred to try to bypass it.
The big barrier stood in front of the king's largest gazebo.
The king, and the entire court, and the crowds -- they all looked at them -- at him and at the horse's distance ahead of Mahotin when they came to hell (so called the deaf barrier).
He felt these eyes directed at him from all sides, but he saw nothing but the ears and neck of his horse, running towards the ground and the croup and the white feet of the Gladiator, who quickly beat him up and stayed at the same distance.
The gladiator went up without knocking anything, waved a short tail and disappeared from the eye of Vronski.
'Bravo! 'Said someone with one voice.'
At the same moment, the boards of the barrier were shone in front of him, in front of him.
Without the slightest change of movement, the horse rose under it; the boards fled, and only from behind did something hit.
Hot by the leading Gladiator, the horse rose too early in front of the barrier and hit him with a back hoove.
But her move did not change, and when he found a lump of dirt in his face, he realized that he was once again at the same distance from Gladiator.
He saw again his croup, his short tail, and again the same unlucky, fast-moving white legs.
At the very moment, when he thought about going around Mahotin, Fru-Fru himself, realizing what he had already thought, without any encouragement, put a lot of pressure on him and began to approach Mahotin from the best side, on the side of the rope. Mahotin didn't give the ropes.
The way Fru-Fru changed her leg and started to go around like that was just thinking about what could be bypassed by the outside.
Fru-Froux's shoulder began to become darker than Gladiator's croup. A few jumps they went by.
But in the face of the obstacle that they came up to, when he did not go through a large circle, he began to work as a guide, and quickly, on the surface, Mahotin was bypassed.
He saw a little bit of his face splashed with dirt. He even thought he was smiling.
While he was walking around Mahotin, he felt him right behind him, and he could not stop hearing behind his back a flat leap and a sniffling, still fresh breath of Gladiator's nostrils.
The next two obstacles, a ditch and a barrier, were easily crossed, but he began to hear Gladiator's boots and rods closer.
He sent a horse and was happy to feel that it had easily increased the pace, and the sound of Gladiator's hooves was heard again at the same distance.
It was what he wanted to do and what Cord advised him to do, and now he was confident of success.
His excitement, joy, and tenderness to the Fru-Fru were increasing.
He wanted to look back, but he didn't dare do it, and he tried to calm himself and not send horses to save a supply like the one he felt at Gladiator.
There remained one and the most difficult obstacle; if he passed it ahead of others, he would be the first to come.
He was bouncing up to the Irish canteen.
Together with Fru-Fru, he had seen this canteen from afar, and together with them both, he and the horses, he had an instant doubt.
He noticed the indecision in the horse's ears and raised the whip, but immediately felt that the doubt was unfounded: the horse knew what was needed. It also measured itself, just as he thought it would, and pushed away from the ground, and gave up the force of inertia, which carried it far beyond the ditch; and in the same manner, without effort, from the same foot, Fru-Fru continued the leap.
'Bravo, Vronsky! 'He heard the voices of a bunch of people -- he knew his regiment and his friends -- who stood in the way of that obstacle; he couldn't help but recognize Yashwin's voice, but he didn't see it.
"Oh, my darling!" 'I thought he was on Fru-Fru, listening to what was happening in the back.'
"You're upside down!" 'He thought, when he heard the Gladiator coming from behind.'
There was one last groove with water in two arches.
While he did not look at her, he wanted to be the first to go, working in a round - up manner, raising and lowering the horse's head.
He felt that the horse was coming from the last supply; not only her neck and shoulders were wet, but on the groove, on the head, on the sharp ears, sweated, and she breathed abruptly and briefly.
But he knew that the supply of this would be too much for the remaining two hundred seedlings.
Only because he felt closer to the ground, and by the special gentleness of his motion, he knew how much his horse's speed added.
She flew over as though she had not noticed it as a bird; but at this very time he felt, to his horror, that, having not kept up with the horse's movement, he himself had made a bad, unforgivable move, falling down on the horse.
Suddenly his situation changed, and he realized something terrible had happened.
He could not yet be aware of what had happened, just as the white legs of the red horse had been crushed, and Mahotin had passed by on a fast horse.
He was touched by one foot on the ground, and his horse fell on that leg.
He barely had time to get out of his leg, as she fell on one side, snoring heavily, and, in order to rise up, the futile efforts of her thin sweaty neck, she splintered on the ground at his feet like a bird that had been shot.
The awkward movement made by Vronski broke her back.
But he figured it out a lot after.
Now all he could see was that Mahotin had moved away quickly, and he was standing alone on a filthy, stationary ground, and in front of him, breathing hard, lay Fru-Fru, and turned her head over to him, staring at him with her lovely eye.
Still don't understand what happened, he pulled a horse for a reason.
Once again, she was full of fish, cracking her saddle wings, spun out her front legs, but she couldn't lift her ass, and immediately went over and fell on her side again.
With a disfigured face, a pale face, and a trembling lower jaw, he struck her with a heel in the abdomen, and again began to pull the lead. But she didn't move, and when she snored into the ground, she looked at the master with her talking look.
'Aaah! 'Whispered through the head, grabbing the head.' 'Aaah! What did I do? 'He screamed.' 'And a lost race!
And my guilt, shameless, unforgivable!
And that poor, sweet, destroyed horse!
Ahh! What did I do?
People, doctor and nurse, his regiment officers ran to him.
Unfortunately, he felt unharmed.
The horse broke its back and decided to shoot it.
He couldn't answer questions, he couldn't talk to anyone.
He turned around and didn't lift his head off, and he went away from the hippodrome, not knowing where he was.
He felt unhappy.
For the first time in his life, he experienced the most severe misery, the most incorruptible disaster, and the kind in which he had wine himself.
Yaszwyn with a hat caught up with him, walked him home, and after half an hour he came to his senses.
But the memory of this race has long remained in his soul the most painful and painful memory of his life.
Alexey Alexandrovich's external relationship with his wife was the same as before.
The only difference was that he was even more busy than before.
As in previous years, with the opening of spring, he went to the waters abroad to improve his annual hard-working winter health and, as usual, returned in July and immediately took up his regular work with increased energy.
As usual, his wife moved him for the day, and he stayed in Petersburg.
Since that conversation after the evening at Princess Tverska's, he has never spoken to Anna about his suspicions and jealousy, and that ordinary tone of someone's performance was no more convenient for his current relationship with his wife.
He was a little colder to his wife.
He only seemed to have a little displeasure with her for the first night talk she turned away from herself.
In his relationship with her, there was a shade of displeasure, but no more.
"You didn't want to explain yourself to me," he said, thinking to her, "the worse for you.
Now you're gonna ask me, and I'm not gonna explain myself.
Even worse for you,' he said in his mind, as a man who tried in vain to put out the fire, would be angry with his vain efforts and would say, "So on you! You're gonna burn for it."
He, this smart and thin man in the line of duty, didn't understand all the madness of this attitude towards his wife.
He did not understand it because he was too afraid to understand his real situation, and he closed, locked and sealed the box in which he had his feelings for his family, that is, his wife and son.
Since the end of this winter, he, a caring father, has become particularly cold with his son and has had the same tremor with him as with his wife.
"Ah! Young man!" 'He turned to him.'
Alexey Alexandrovich thought and said that in no year had he had as much service business as he had in the present; but he did not realize that he himself was making things up for himself this year, that it was one of the means to not open the box where his feelings for his wife and family and his thoughts about them were, and that they were making it worse the longer they lay there.
If anyone had the right to ask Alexei Alexandrovich what he thought of his wife's behavior, the mild, humble Alexi Alexandrovich would not answer, but would be very angry with the man who would ask him about it.
That's what made Alexei Alexandrovich's face look like something proud and strict when he was asked about his wife's health.
Alexey Alexandrovich didn't want to think about his wife's behavior and feelings, and he really didn't think about it.
Alexey Alexandrovich's constant gift was in Petergof, and usually the Countess Lydia Ivanovna lived there in the summer, in her neighborhood, and in her regular relationship with Anna.
This year, Countess Lydia Ivanovna refused to live in Petergof, never visited Anna Arkadievna, and insinuated Alexei Alexandrovich with the inconvenience of bringing Anna closer to Betty and Vronski.
Alexey Alexandrovich strictly stopped her, suggesting that his wife was above suspicion, and since then he has avoided Countess Lydia Ivanovna.
He did not want to see or see that many people were already looking at his wife in light, and he did not want to understand or understand why his wife insisted especially on moving to the Czarsy, where Betsy lived, where he was not far from the Vronski regiment camp.
He did not allow himself to think about it, nor did he think about it; yet he knew, in his heart, never saying it to himself, and having no proof, but also suspicion, that he was a cheated husband, and he was deeply unhappy.
How many times during his eight-year happy life with his wife, when he looked at other false wives and cheated husbands, he said to himself, "How can I let this happen? How can we not untie this ugly situation?"
But now that the trouble was on his head, not only did he not think about how to untie it, but he didn't want to know it, he didn't want to know it just because it was too horrible, too unnatural.
Since his return from abroad, he has been at the service twice.
One lunch, another evening with guests, but he never spent the night, as he used to do in earlier years.
The race day was a very busy day for Alexei Alexandrovich; however, in the morning, having made his own schedule, he decided that immediately after early lunch, he would go to his wife's house and from there to the races where he would be in the yard and at which he would have to be.
He's going to visit his wife because he's decided to visit her once a week for decency.
In addition, on that day, he had to hand over to his wife by the 15th, in order of expenditure.
With ordinary authority over his thoughts, after considering all this about his wife, he did not allow his thoughts to spread further about what had touched her.
It was very busy with Alexei Alexandrovich this morning.
The day before, Countess Lydia Ivanovna sent him a brochure from a famous traveler in China in Petersburg asking him to receive the traveler himself, the man, for various reasons, very interesting and appropriate.
Alexei Alexandrovich did not read the brochure in the evening and finished reading it this morning.
Then there were the applicants, the reports, the receptions, the appointments, the removal, the distribution of the awards, the pensions, the salaries, the correspondence -- the day-to-day business, as it was called by Alexey Alexandrovich, who took so much time.
Then there was a case file, a doctor's visit, and a case manager's visit.
The manager didn't take long.
He just gave Alexey Alexandrovich the money he needed and gave a brief account of the state of affairs that were not very good, as it happened that this year, due to frequent visits, had lived longer, and there was a deficit.
But the doctor, the famous Peterburg doctor, who was in a friendly relationship with Alexei Alexandrovich, took a long time.
Alexei Alexandrovich did not wait for him today, and he was surprised by his arrival and even more so by the fact that the doctor had asked him very carefully about his condition, listened to his chest, knocked and felt his liver.
Alexey Alexandrovich did not know that his friend Lydia Ivanovna, noting that the health of Alexey Alexandrovich was not good this year, asked the doctor to come and see the patient.
"Do it for me," said Countess Lydia Ivanovna.
'I will do it for Russia, Countess,' answered the doctor.
'A priceless man! 'The Countess Lydia Ivanovna said.'
The doctor was very displeased with Alexei Alexandrovich.
He found the liver significantly enlarged, the food reduced, and no water action.
He ordered as much physical movement as possible and as little mental tension as possible and, above all, no sadness, that is, what was impossible for Alexei Alexandrovich as not to breathe; and he left, leaving in Alexei Alexandrovich with an unpleasant consciousness that something was wrong in him and that it could not be corrected.
When he left Alexei Alexandrovich, the doctor encountered a well - known human on the porch, the ruler of Alexei Alexandrovich's affairs.
They were college buddies and, although they rarely met, respected each other and were good friends, and therefore, as Sluddin, the doctor would not express his frank opinion of the sick.
'How glad I am that you were with him,' said Sluddin. 'He's not good, and I think...
Well?
'This is what,' said the doctor, waving over Sluddin''s head to serve to his coach. 'This is what,' said the doctor, taking his white finger in his hands with a sticky glove and pulling it. 'Don't pull the strings and try to break them -- very difficult; but pull to the last opportunity and put the weight of your finger on the tight string -- it will burst.' And he, because of his sensitivity, his integrity to work -- he's gonna push to the last degree; and the pressure is, and the pressure is, hard -- concluded the doctor, raising his eyebrows considerably. 'Will you be at the races?' 'He added it to his carriage.' 'Yes, yes, of course, it takes a lot of time,' the doctor answered something similar to what was said by the public and not heard by him.
After a doctor who took so much time, a famous traveler appeared, and while using the brochure he had just read and his previous knowledge of the subject, he struck the traveler with the depth of his knowledge of the subject and the breadth of his enlightened look.
The traveler was informed of the arrival of the leader of the Republic who had arrived in Petersburg and had to have a word with him.
After his departure, the day-to-day class with the ruler of the case had to be completed, and a serious and important case had to be visited by a significant individual.
Alexey Alexandrovich just got back to his five o'clock, lunchtime, and after having lunch with the ruler of the business, invited him to ride with him to the gym and to the races.
Without giving up on that report, he was now looking for a third person on his date with his wife.
Anna stood upstairs in front of the mirror, pinning Anna's last bow on the dress when she heard the sounds of squeezing wheels at the entrance.
"It's too early for Betsy," she thought, and looking out the window, she saw a carriage and a black hat coming out of it and so familiar to her ears with Alexei Alexandrovich.
"Wouldn't you care to sleep?" 'She thought, and she felt so awful and awful all that could come out of it, that, without a moment of thought, with a merry and shining face, she came out to meet them and felt the presence of a spirit of lies and deception already familiar to her, immediately gave up on that spirit and began to speak, not knowing herself what she would say.'
'Oh, that's cute! 'She said, giving her hand to her husband and a smile, saying hello to the man of the house, the man of the people.' 'You're sleeping, I hope? 'It was the first word that gave her the spirit of deception,' and now we are going together.
I'm just sorry I promised Betsy.
She'll pick me up.
Alexey Alexandrovich sniffed in the name of Betsy.
'Oh, I will not separate the inseparable,' he said with his usual tone of joke. 'We will go with Michael Vasiljevic.
The doctors tell me to go.
I'll walk the road and pretend I'm on the water.
'There is no rush,' said Anna. 'Would you like some tea?' 'She called.
'Give me some tea and tell Serezha that Alexis Alexandrovich is here.
So, how's your health?
Michael Vasiljevic, you were not with me. Look how good I am on the balcony,' she said, turning to him and to the other.
She spoke very simply and naturally, but too much and too soon.
She felt it herself, especially since in the curious look that Michael Vasiljevic had looked at her, she noticed that he had seen her.
Michael Vasiljevic immediately went to the terrace. She sat next to her husband.
'You don't look very good,' she said.
'Yes,' he said, 'the doctor was with me today and took an hour.
I feel like one of my friends sent him, so precious to my health...
'No, what did he say?'
She asked him about his health and activities, encouraged him to rest and move in with her.
All of this she spoke fun, quickly, and with special glitter in her eyes; but Alexei Alexandrovich no longer attributed any importance to this tone.
He heard nothing but what she said, and gave them nothing but what they had a clear meaning.
And he answered her simply, even though it was funny.
There was nothing special about this conversation, but never, without painful pain, did Anna remember the whole short scene.
Serezha, before the governess, came in.
If Alexei Alexandrovich had allowed himself to observe, he would have noticed a shy, confused look at what Serezha looked at his father and then his mother.
But he didn't want to see or see anything.
'Ah, young man!
He grew up.
It's really a man's job.
Hello, young man.
And he gave his hand to the scared Serezha.
Serezha, who was previously shy about his father, now that he had become a young man, Alexanderovich, and the mystery of his father's friend or enemy, had come to his mind.
He, like, asked for protection, looked back at his mother.
He was happy with one mother.
In the meantime, when he spoke to the governess, he held his son by his shoulder, and Serezha was so painfully embarrassed that Anna saw that he was going to cry.
Anna, who was blushing the minute the son came in, noticed that Serezha was uncomfortable, quickly jumped up, lifted up her son's hand, and kissed his son, and led him to the terrace, and immediately returned.
'But it is time,' she said, looking at her watch, 'that it is Betsy who is not going!'
'Yes,' said Alexis Alexandrovich, and stood up, laid his hands and beat them. 'I've come to bring you some more money, because the nightingale is not fed,' he said. 'You need, I think.'
'No, you don't... yeah, you do,' she said, without looking at him and turning red to the root of his hair. 'You, I think, will come here from the races.'
'Yes! 'Alexei Alexandrovich answered. 'Here comes the beauty of Petergof, Princess Tver of Tver,' he added, looking out the window into English, in coats, a crew with an extremely high-mounted tiny body of a wheelchair. 'Oh, that's so slutty!
Beautiful!
Well, let's go, too.
Princess Tverska didn't leave the crew, but only her in stabilisers, diaper, and a black footman's hat popped off at the door.
'I'm coming, goodbye! 'Anna said, and when she kissed her son, she came to him, and reached out to him.' 'You're very nice to be here.
Alexei Alexandrovich kissed her hand.
'Well, goodbye.
You're gonna stop by for tea, and it's great! 'She said, and came out, shining and merry.'
But as soon as she stopped seeing him, she felt the place on her hand that his lips touched and freaked out.
When Alexey Alexandrovich showed up at the races, Anna was already sitting in a gazebo next to Betsy, where the entire high society was gathering.
She saw her husband from afar.
Two men, husband and lover, were two centres of life for her, and without the help of external feelings, she felt close to her.
She felt her husband's approach from afar, and she followed him willingly in the waves of crowds between which he was moving.
She saw him walk up to the gazebo, with a condescending response to the scrambling bowels, a friendly way of saying hello to the equals, a careful wait for the eyes of the powerful world, and the removal of his round large hat, pressing the tips of his ears.
She knew all these tricks, and they were all disgusting to her.
"One ambition, one desire to make it -- that's all that's in his soul -- she thought, "and high considerations, love of education, religion, all these are just tools to make it happen."
According to his views on the ladies' gazebo (he looked straight at her, but did not recognize the wife in the sea of kisei, ribbons, feathers, umbrellas, and flowers), she realized that he was looking for her; but she deliberately ignored him.
'Alexei Alexandrovich! 'The Princess Betsy cried out to him,' you surely do not see his wife; here she is!
He smiled with his cold smile.
'There's so much glitter in here that his eyes were torn apart,' he said, and went to the gazebo.
He smiled at his wife, as his husband should smile, meeting his wife, whom he had just seen, and said hello to the princess and other acquaintances, paying tribute to everyone, i.e. by joking with the ladies and by extending greetings to the men.
At the bottom of the gazebo, there was a respected Aleksandrovich, known for his intelligence and education as Adjutant General.
Alexei Alexandrovich spoke to him.
There was a distance between the races, so nothing prevented the conversation.
The Adjutant General condemned the races.
Alexei Alexandrovich objected to defending them.
Anna listened to his thin, smooth voice, not missing a single word, and every word of it seemed false to her and pained her ear.
When the quadruple race began with obstacles, she leaned forward and, without letting down her eyes, looked at the horse that was approaching and sat down, and at the same time heard this disgusting, uneasy voice of her husband.
She was afraid of him, but she was even more tormented by those who remained silent, she thought the sound of her husband's fine voice with familiar tones.
'I am a bad woman, I am a dead woman,' she thought, 'but I don't like lying, I hate lying, and his (husband) food is a lie.
He knows everything, sees everything; how does he feel if he can speak so calmly?
If he had killed me, if he had killed Vronski, I would have respected him.
But no, he only wants lies and decency," Anna said to herself, without thinking about what she wanted from her husband, what she wanted him to be.
She also did not realize that the current particular wordishness of Alexey Alexandrovich, who was so annoying to her, was merely an expression of his inner anxiety and anxiety.
Just as a child who had been killed jumping into the movement of his muscles to muffle the pain, so it was necessary for Alexey Alexandrovich to have a mental movement to silence those thoughts about his wife that required attention in her presence and in the presence of Vronsky and the constant repetition of his name.
And just as it was natural for a child to jump, so it was natural for him to speak intelligently.
He said:
'The danger of a military, cavalry race is a necessary condition for a race.
If England can point to the most brilliant cavalry affairs in military history, it is only because it has historically developed this power of animals and humans.
Sport, in my opinion, is important, and, as always, we see only the most superficial.
'Not superficial,' said Princess Tversky.
One officer is said to have broken two ribs.
Alexey Alexandrovich smiled with his smile, only open his teeth, but never say anything else.
'Let's say, Princess, that it is not superficial,' he said, 'but internal.
But that is not the case -- and he again turned to the general he spoke seriously -- do not forget that the military, who have chosen these activities, will ride and accept that every calling has its backside of the medal.
This is directly the responsibility of the military.
The ugly sport of fist fighting or Spanish threads is a sign of barbarism. But specialized sport is a sign of development.
'No, I won't go another time; I care too much,' said Princess Betsy. 'Isn't that right, Anna?
'It's exciting, but you can't lose it,' said the other lady. 'If I were a Roman, I wouldn't miss any circus.
Anna didn't say anything, and she wouldn't let the binoculars down.
At that time, a high general was passing through the gazebo.
After interrupting his speech, Alexis Alexandrovich quickly rose up and bowed low to a former military officer.
'Do you not ride? 'He was joking with the military.'
'My race is more difficult,' answered Alexi Alexandrovich respectfully.
And even though the answer didn't mean anything, the military pretended to get a smart word from a smart man and fully understood la pointe de la sauce.
'There are two sides,' he continued, 'the performers and the spectators; and the love of these shows is the surest sign of underdevelopment for the audience, I agree, but...
'The Princess, bet! 'The voice of Stepan Arkadyich at the bottom, who spoke to Betsy, was heard.' 'Who do you hold for?'
'Anna and I are for Prince Kuzovlev,' replied Betsy.
'I'm in favour of Vronsky.
A couple of gloves.
'It's coming!
'How beautiful is it, isn't it?
Alexey Alexandrovich silenced while talking near him, but immediately started again.
'I agree, but manly games...' he continued.
But while they were driving, all the conversations stopped.
Alexei Alexandrovich was also silenced, and everyone went up and turned to the river.
Alexey Alexandrovich wasn't interested in racing, so he didn't look at the racing, but he'd wandered around the viewers with tired eyes.
His look stopped at Anna.
Her face was pale and strict.
She obviously saw nothing but one.
Her hand was squeezing the fan, and she wasn't breathing.
He looked at her and turned away in haste, looking at other faces.
"This lady and others are also very excited; it's very natural," he said to himself.
He didn't want to look at her, but his eyes were drawn to her.
He looked back at that face, trying not to read what was so clearly written on it, and, against his will, he read with horror what he did not want to know.
Kuzovlev's first fall on the river moved everyone, but Aleksei Alexandrovich saw clearly on Anna's pale, triumphant face that the man she was looking at had not fallen.
When Mahotin and Wronski jumped over the big barrier, the next officer fell right on his head and fell dead and sounded terror across the public, he saw that Anna had not even noticed it and had difficulty understanding what was being said around him.
But he was looking at her more and more often and with more perseverance.
Anna, swallowed up by the sight of the racing Bronski, felt from the side the look of her husband's cold eyes.
She looked back for a moment, looked at him questionably, and, frowning a little bit, she turned away again.
'Oh, I don't care,' said she as if she had told him and never looked at him again.
The races were unhappy, and more than half of the 17 people fell and crashed.
By the end of the race, everyone was in a state of excitement, which was further increased by the fact that the king was displeased.
Everyone expressed their displeasure, everyone repeated someone's phrase, "The only thing missing is a lion circus," and it felt awful to everyone, so when Vronski fell and Anna went out loud, there was nothing unusual about it.
But there was a change in Anna's face that was already indecent.
She's completely lost.
She started fighting like a caught bird, wanting to get up and go somewhere, and she was talking to Betsy.
'Let's go, let's go,' she said.
But Betsy didn't hear her.
She spoke, leaning down, with the general who approached her.
Alexey Alexandrovich approached Anna and kindly gave her his hand. 'Come, if you will,' he said in French; but Anna listened to what the General said and did not notice her husband.
'I broke my leg, too, they say,' said the General. 'It doesn't look like anything.
Anna did not respond to her husband, and lifted up the binoculars, and looked at the place where he had fallen: but it was so far away, and there were so many people there that nothing could be taken apart.
She dropped the binoculars and wanted to go; but in the meantime, the officer jumped and reported to the king.
Anna leaned forward, listening.
'Steve!
Steve! 'She cried out to her brother.
But my brother didn't hear her.
She wanted to come out again.
'I offer you my hand again, if you want to go,' said Alexandrovich, touching her hand.
She repulsed himself from him, and without looking him in the face, she said,
'No, no, leave me alone, I will stay.'
She now saw an officer running across the circle from the scene of the fall of Wronski to the gazebo.
Betsy waved his handkerchief.
The officer brought the news that he didn't kill himself, but the horse broke its back.
After hearing this, Anna quickly sat down and closed her face with a fan.
Alexey Alexandrovich saw that she was crying and couldn't contain not only the tears but also the tears that raised her breasts.
Alexei Alexandrovich blocked her by himself, giving her time to recover.
'For the third time I offer you my hand,' he said in a few minutes, turning to it.
Anna looked at him and didn't know what to say.
Princess Betsy came to her rescue.
'No, Alexis Alexandrovich, I took Anna away, and I promised to take her away,' Betsy intervened.
'Excuse me, Princess,' he said with a gracious smile, but with a firm look into her eyes, 'but I see that Anna is not well, and I wish she would come with me.
Anna looked back, stood up in submission, and put her hand on her husband's hand.
'I will send him, I will find out, and I will send him,' whispered Betsy to her.
At the exit of the gazebo, Alexi Alexandrovich, as always, spoke to those who met, and Anna had to answer and speak, as always; but she was not herself, and as she was in sleep with her husband.
"Did you kill yourself or not?
Really?
Is he coming or not?
Will I see him today?" 'I thought she did.'
She sat silently in the carriage of Alexei Alexandrovich and left the crew in silence.
Despite everything he had seen, he did not allow himself to think of his wife's real situation.
He's only seen external signs.
He saw that she was being indecent, and thought it was his duty to tell her that.
But it was very difficult for him not to say more, but to say only that.
He opened his mouth to tell her how indecent she was, but he said something completely different.
'How, however, we are all prone to these violent sights,' he said. 'I notice...
'What? I don't understand,' said Anna in contempt.
He was insulted and immediately began to say what he wanted.
'I must tell you,' he said.
"Here's the explanation," she thought, and she got scared.
'I must tell you that you are indecent these days,' he said to her in French.
'What was I doing indecently?' 'She said loudly, turning her head toward him and looking him straight into his eyes, but no longer with the previous cover-up, but with the determined appearance under which she could hardly hide the fear she was under.'
'Don't forget,' he said to her, pointing to an open window against the coachman. He climbed up and picked up the glass.
'What did you find indecent?' &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt;She repeated it.
'That despair you couldn't hide in the fall of one of the riders.
He waited for her to object; but she did not speak when she looked before her.
'I have already asked you to keep yourself in the light so that the wicked tongues could not speak against you.
There was a time when I was talking about internal relations; I wasn't talking about them.
Now I'm talking about external relations.
You were being rude, and I wish it wouldn't happen again.
She didn't hear half of what he said, she was afraid of him, and she was wondering if it was true that Vronsky hadn't killed himself.
Did they say he was safe and the horse broke his back?
She only pretended to laugh when he came out, and she didn't answer anything because she didn't hear what he said.
Aleksey Alexandrovich began to speak with courage, but when he understood clearly what he was saying, the fear she was feeling came to his attention.
He saw that smile, and a strange mistake came upon him.
"She smiles at my suspicions.
Yeah, she's gonna say what she said to me the other day, that there's no reason for me to suspect that it's funny."
Now that everything had been revealed to him, he wanted nothing more than to make her, as in the past, ridiculously answer him that his suspicions were ridiculous and unfounded.
It was so scary that he knew he was ready to believe everything now.
But the expression of her face, frightened and dark, no longer promised even deception.
'Maybe I'm wrong,' he said. 'In that case, I apologize.'
'No, you were right,' she said slowly, looking desperately at his cold face. 'You were right.
I was, and I can't help being desperate.
I listen to you and think about him.
I love him, I'm his mistress, I can't bear it, I'm afraid I hate you...
Do what you want to me.
And when she leaned into the corner of the carriage, she wept, closing her hands.
Alexei Alexandrovich did not move or change the direct direction of his eyes. But all of a sudden his face accepted the solemn immobility of the dead, and the expression did not change all the time before delivery.
When he drove up to the house, he turned his head to her with the same expression.
'That's it!
But I demand that the external conditions of decency be respected until then -- his voice trembled -- while I take measures to ensure my honour and inform you of them.
He went ahead and dropped her off.
As a servant, he shook her hand in silence, sat in a carriage and left for Petersburg.
He was followed by a footman from Princess Betsy and brought Anna a note:
"I sent Alexei to learn about his health, and he writes to me that he is healthy and well, but desperate."
"That's how he's gonna be!" she thought. 'How well I did that I told him.'
She looked at the watch.
Three hours to go, and the memories of the last date's details lit up her blood.
"Oh, my God, it's so light!
It's scary, but I love to see his face and I love this fantastic light...
Husband! Uh, yeah...
Well, thank God it's over."
Just as in all the places where people gather and in the little German waters where Shcherbatsky arrived, a normal kind of crystallization of society has taken place, defining a certain and permanent place for every member of society.
As definitely and consistently a piece of water on the cold gets a known form of snow crystal, so that every new person who came to the water was immediately placed in his own place.
Fürst Scherbatsky Castle Gemalin und Tohter, and at the apartment they occupied, both by name and by the acquaintances they found, immediately crystallized into their designated and designated location.
There was a real German Fustin on the waters this year, so the crystallization of society was even more vigorous.
The Princess certainly wished to introduce her daughter to the Princess and performed the ritual on the second day.
Kitty sat low and gracefully in her discharge from Paris, a very simple, very dressy summer dress.
The princess said, "I hope the roses will soon return to this pretty face," and for the Scherbatskys, at once, certain ways of life were firmly established, from which there was no way out.
The Shcherbatskys met both the English lady's family and the German countess and her wounded son in the last war, and the Swedish scientist, and M. Canut and his sister.
But the main society of Shcherbatsky was composed of a Moscow lady, Maria Eugenia Rtishcheva, with a daughter who was unpleasant to Kitty because she was sick, just like her, from love, and a Moscow colonel, whom Kitty had seen and known since childhood in a uniform and epolet, and who here, with his little eyes and open neck in a coloured tie, was incredibly funny and bored by the fact that he could not be separated.
When all this was so firmly established, Kitty became very bored, especially since the prince had gone to Karlsbad and she was left alone with her mother.
She was not interested in those she knew, feeling that nothing would be new from them.
Her main interest in the waters was now observations and guesses of those she did not know.
Kitty's character has always meant the most beautiful things in people, especially those she didn't know.
And now, guessing who -- who, what relationship they had and what kind of people they were, Kitty imagined the most amazing and beautiful things and found confirmation in her observations.
Of these, she was particularly occupied by a Russian girl who came to the water with a sick Russian lady, Madame Stahl, as all of her names were.
Madame Stahl belonged to the highest society, but she was so sick that she couldn't walk, and on rare good days she appeared in the water in a wheelchair.
But not so much in sickness as in pride, as the Princess explained, Madame Stahl was not familiar with any of the Russians.
The Russian girl looked after Madame Stahl and, as Kitty noticed, she came together with all the seriously ill people who were on the water and took care of them in the most natural way.
This Russian girl, Kitty observed, was not related to Madame Stahl, nor was she a hired assistant.
Madame Stahl e-mailed her Varenka, and others called "m-lle Varenka".
Not to mention Kitty's interest in observing the girl's relationship with Ms. Stahl and other strangers, Kitty, as is often the case, had an unexplained sympathy for this m-lle Varenka, and felt in the eyes that she liked...
M-lle Varenka wasn't the first time he was young, but as a creature without youth: it could have been given 19 and 30 years.
If you look at her features, she was more beautiful than bad, despite the painful color of her face.
It would have been well built had it not been for too much body dryness and a disproportionate head in average height; but it should not have been attractive to men.
It looked beautiful, though full of petals, but already blooming, without the smell of flowers.
Moreover, she could not be attractive to men also because she lacked what was too much in Kitty -- the restrained fire of life and the consciousness of her appeal.
She always seemed to be engaged in a business in which there could be no doubt, so she seemed to have no interest in anyone else.
By contrast, she was particularly attracted to Kitty.
Kitty feels-- the fact that in her warehouse of life, she's gonna find a sample of what she's looking for now: the interests of life, the dignity of life -- beyond Kitty &apos; s disgusting secular relations, girls to men who now represent her as a disgraceful display of goods waiting for buyers.
The more Kitty saw her unknown friend, the more she became convinced that the girl was the most perfect creature she had ever imagined, and the more she wanted to meet her.
Both girls met several times a day, and at each meeting, Kitty's eyes said, "Who are you? What are you doing?
Isn't it true that you're the lovely creature I imagine you are?
But do not think, for God's sake,' added her look, 'that I allow myself to be forced into acquaintances.
I'm just looking at you and I love you." 'I love you, too, and you are very, very nice.
And I would have loved you even more if I had the time," the eye of an unknown girl answered.
And indeed, Kitty saw that she was always busy either taking the children of the Russian family out of the water, or carrying a blanket for the patient and tucking her in, or trying to entertain the annoying sick person, or choosing and buying cookies for someone else's coffee.
Soon after the arrival of Shcherbatsky, two other persons came to the morning's waters and took on the same unfriendly attention.
It was a very tall, slutty man with huge hands, short, not tall, and an old coat, with black, naive, and scary eyes, and a jabby-looking woman, very bad and tastelessly dressed.
Having recognized these as Russians, Kitty has already begun to write a beautiful and touching novel about them in his imagination.
But the Princess, learning from Curlist that it was Levin Nikolai and Maria Nikolaevna, explained to Kitty what a bad man that Levin was, and all the dreams of these two men disappeared.
Not so much because her mother told her, but because it was Konstantin's brother, these faces suddenly seemed very unpleasant to Kitty.
This Levin has now turned it on with his habit of chewing his head with an irresistible sense of disgust.
She felt that there was a sense of hatred and ridicule in his large, fear - inspiring eyes, which kept an eye on her, and she tried to avoid meeting him.
It was a bad day, it rained all morning, and those with umbrellas were crowding in the gallery.
Kitty went with his mother and with a Moscow colonel who was having fun in his European, bought a suit ready in Frankfurt.
They walked on one side of the gallery, trying to avoid Levin walking on the other side.
Varenka in her dark dress, in black, with her hat bent down with a blind French woman all over the length of the gallery, and every time she dated Kitty, they looked at her with a friendly look.
'Mom, can I speak to her? 'Kiti said, following her unknown friend and noticing that she was approaching the key and that they could get together with him.'
'Yes, if that's what you want, I'll find out about her first, and I'll come over myself,' replied her mother. 'What did you find special in her?
The company must be.
If you want, I'll meet Madame Stahl.
I knew her belle-sooeur, and I added a princess, raising her head proudly.
Kitty knew that the Princess was insulted by Ms. Stahl &apos; s failure to meet her.
Kitty didn't insist.
'A miracle, how lovely! 'She said, looking at Varenka, while she was serving a glass to the French woman. 'Look how simple it is, lovely.
'It is hilarious for me,' said the princess, 'no, let's go back,' she added, noting his move toward Levin with her lady and with the German doctor, with whom he spoke loudly and angryly.
They turned around to go back, and suddenly they weren't hearing a loud talk, they were screaming.
Levin stopped and screamed, and the doctor was too hot.
The crowd was gathering around them.
The Princess and Kitty quickly withdrew, and the colonel joined the crowd to find out what was going on.
In a few minutes, the colonel chased them.
'What was that? 'The Princess asked.'
'Woe and shame! 'The colonel answered. 'One thing you're afraid of is meeting Russians abroad.
This tall gentleman fought with the doctor, told him the insolence that he didn't treat him so well, and he waved a stick.
Shame on you!
'Oh, how unpleasant!' said the Princess. 'Well, how did it end?'
'Thank you, this... this one with a mushroom in her hat has intervened.' Russian, I think,' said the colonel.
'M-lle Varenka?' 'It was a joy to ask Kitty.'
'Yes, yes.
She was most likely found, she took this gentleman under her arm and took him away.
'Here, Mama,' said Kitty to her mother, 'you are surprised that I admire her.
From the next day, after watching an unknown friend, Kitty noticed that m-lle Varenka and Levin and his woman were already in the same relationship as their other proteges.
She approached them, talking-- walah, serving as a translator for a woman who wasn't able to speak any foreign language.
Kitty begged her mother even more to let her meet Varenka. And as unpleasant as it was to the Princess as it was to take the first step in wanting to meet Mrs. Stahl, allowing herself something to be proud of, she took a look at Varenka and, after learning about her the details that led her to conclude that nothing bad, though good, was little, in that acquaintance, the first one came to Varenka and met her.
After choosing the time when her daughter went to the key and Varenka stopped against the baker, the Princess approached her.
'Let me meet you,' she said with her worthy smile. 'My daughter is in love with you,' she said. 'You may not know me.
I...
'This is more than mutual, Princess,' replied Varenka in haste.
'What a good deed you did to our pathetic compatriot yesterday! 'The Princess said.'
The boil's blushing.
'I don't remember, I didn't seem to do anything,' she said.
'Well, you saved this Levin from trouble...'
'Yes, sa compagne called me, and I tried to calm him: he was very sick and displeased with the doctor...'
And I have a habit of following these sick people.
'Yes, I hear you live in Menton with your aunt, I think, m-me Stahl.
I knew her belle soeur.
'No, she's not my aunt.
I call her maman, but I am not related to her; I am brought up by her, 'Bloody again,' answered Varenka.
It was so easy to say, so sweet was the true and open expression of her face, that the Princess understood why her Kitty fell in love with this Varenka.
'Well, what about Levin? 'The Princess asked.'
'He is leaving,' replied Varenka.
At that time, with the joy of her mother meeting her unknown friend, Kitty came up with the key.
'Well, Kitty, your strong desire to meet Mademoiselle...'
'Varynka,' said Varenka, smiling, 'that's what everyone calls me.
Kitty blushed with joy and was silently stinging her new friend &apos; s hand, who did not answer her shake -- but lay still in her hand.
The hand didn't answer the shake, but m-lle Varenka's face glowed with a quiet, joyful, though somewhat sad smile, opening her big but beautiful teeth.
'I wanted it myself a long time ago,' she said.
'But you are so busy...'
'Oh, on the contrary, I am not busy,' replied Varenka, but at the same moment I should have left my new acquaintances, because two little Russian girls, the sick's daughter, ran to her.
'Varynka, my mother is calling! 'They were screaming...'
And Varenka followed them.
The details that the Princess learned about the past Varenka and her relationship with Madame Stahl and Mrs. Stahl himself were as follows.
Madame Stahl, some of whom said that she had tortured her husband, while others said that he had tormented her with his immoral conduct, was always a painful and enthralled woman.
When she had already divorced her husband, the first child, the child died immediately, and Mrs. Stahl &apos; s family, knowing her sensitivity and fearing that the news would not kill her, replaced her with a child born the same night and in the same house in Petersburg, the daughter of the court chef.
It was Varenka.
Madame Stahl later learned that Varenka was not her daughter, but she continued to raise her, especially since very soon after Varenka had no family left.
Madame Stahl has lived abroad in the south for over a decade, never getting out of bed.
And some said that Madame Stahl had made herself a virtuous, religious woman; others said that she was in the soul of the most moral creature living only for the good of her neighbor, as she had imagined.
No one knew what religion it was -- Catholic, Protestant or Orthodox; but one thing was certain -- it was in friendly relations with the highest figures of all churches and confessions.
Varenka lived with her all the time abroad, and everyone who knew Madame Stahl knew and loved m-lle Varenka, as everyone called her.
Having learned all these details, the Princess found nothing wrong with her daughter &apos; s proximity to Varenka, especially since Varenka had the best manners and upbringing: she spoke well in French and English and, most importantly, told Ms. Stahl &apos; s regret that she did not have the pleasure of meeting the Princess sickly.
After meeting Varenka, Kitty became more and more flattered by her friend and found new qualities in her every day.
The Princess, after hearing that Varenka was a good singer, asked her to come to them tonight to sing.
'Kiti is playing, and we have a piano, a bad one, really, but you will give us great pleasure,' said the Princess with her fake smile, which is particularly unpleasant now Kitty, because she noticed that Varenka did not want to sing.
But Varenka, however, came tonight and brought a notebook with her.
The Princess invited Maria Evgenevna and her daughter and the colonel.
Varenka seemed completely indifferent to the fact that she had faces unknown to her, and immediately approached the piano.
She didn't know how to accompani herself, but she read the notes well in her voice.
Kitty, who played well, accompanied her.
'You have an extraordinary talent,' said the Princess to her, after Varenka had performed her first play beautifully.
Mary Evgenevna and her daughter were grateful and praised.
'Look,' said the colonel, looking out the window, 'what an audience is going to listen to you. 'It is true that a rather large crowd gathered under the windows.
'I am very glad that this is a pleasure to you,' replied Varenka simply.
Kitty looked proudly at her friend.
She admired both her art and her voice and her face, but most admired her manner, that Varenka apparently did not think anything about her singing and was completely indifferent to praise; as if she only asked if she needed to sing or enough?
'If it were me,' thought Kitty of herself, 'how proud I would be of it!
How happy I would be to look at this crowd under the windows!
She doesn't care at all.
She is motivated only by the desire not to refuse and to make a pleasant maman.
What's in it?
What gives her this power to ignore everyone, to be independently calm?
How much I would like to know and learn from it,' Kitty thought, looking into that calm face.
The Princess asked Varenka to sing more, and Varenka sang another play just as well, clearly and well, standing by the piano and beating it with her thin, dark hand.
The next song in the playbook was an Italian song.
Kitty played the foreplay and looked back at Varenka.
'Let's skip this one,' said Varenka red.
Kitty was scared and asked to stop her eyes on Varenka's face.
'Well, another one,' she quickly said, turning over the sheets and immediately realizing that something had been connected to the piece.
'No,' answered Varenka, putting her hand on the notes and smiling, 'no, sing this. 'And she sang it as calm, cold and good as ever.
When she came out, everyone thanked her again and went for tea.
Kitty and Varenka went to the nursery, who was near the house.
'Is it true that you have a recollection of this song? 'Oh, Kitty said.' 'You do not say,' she quickly added, 'only say, 'is it true?'
'No, why?
I will say, 'I just said Varenka, and without waiting for an answer, I continued: 'Yes, it is a memory, and it was hard once.
I loved one person. That's the thing I sang to him.
Kitty, with her big eyes open, looked at Varenka in silence.
'I loved him, and he loved me; but his mother did not want, and he married another.'
He lives near us now, and I see him sometimes.
Didn't you think I was having an affair, too? 'She said, and in her beautiful face, the light that Kitty felt was about to shine all over her.'
'I didn't think so?'
If I was a man, I couldn't love anyone after I knew you.
I just don't understand how he could please his mother to forget you and make you miserable; he didn't have a heart.
'Oh no, he is a very good man, and I am not unhappy; on the contrary, I am very happy.
So we're not gonna sing anymore? 'She added on her way to the house.'
'How good you are, how good you are!' cried Kitty and stopped her and kissed her. 'If only I could be a little like you!
'Why do you have to be like someone like that?'
You are as good as you are,' said Varenka, smiling with her mild and tired smile.
'No, I'm not good at all.
Well, tell me...
Wait, wait,' said Kitty, sitting her back on the bench next to herself. 'Tell me, isn't it offensive to think that a man has neglected your love, that he didn't want to?'
'He did not ignore me; I believe he loved me, but he was a obedient son...'
'Yes, but if it weren't for his mother's will, but for himself?' 'Said Kitty, feeling that she had given away her secret, and that her face, burning with the gloom of shame, had already exposed her.'
'Then he would have done wrong, and I would not have pity on him,' replied Varenka, obviously realizing that it wasn't about her, but about Kitty.
'But insult?' 'Oh, Kitty said.' 'Insults cannot be forgotten, they cannot be forgotten,' she said, remembering her view of the last ball, during the stoppage of music.
'What is the insult?
You didn't do anything wrong, did you?
'Woe is worse than bad.' Shame on you.
Varenka shook her head and put her hand on Kitty's hand.
'What's so embarrassing? 'She said.' 'Cause you couldn't tell a man who doesn't care about you that you love him?
'Of course not; I never said a single word, but he knew.
No, no, there are views, there are manners.
I'll live a hundred years, I won't forget.
'So what?'
I don't understand.
The point is whether you love him now or not,' said Varenka, calling everything by name.
'I hate him; I cannot forgive myself.'
'So what?'
'Insult, shame, insult.'
'Oh, if everyone were as sensitive as you are,' said Varenka. 'There is no girl who wouldn't have experienced it.
And it doesn't matter.
'What's important? 'I asked Kitty, looking at her face with curious surprise.
'Ah, a lot is important,' said Varenka, smiling.
'Ah, much more important,' replied Varenka, not knowing what to say. But at that time, the Princess's voice was heard from the window:
'Kiti, fresh!
Either take the shawl or go to the rooms.
'Really, it is time! 'Said Varenka, standing up.'
I still have to go to Madame Berthe; she asked me to.
Kitty held her hand with passionate curiosity and begged her to look at her, saying, "What, what is the most important thing that gives her such calm?
You know, tell me!"
But Varenka didn't even understand what Kitty was asking for.
All she remembered was that she still needed to go to m-me verthe and get home by 12:00 for tea maman.
She walked into the rooms, collected notes, and, after saying goodbye to everyone, she was going to leave.
'Let me walk you out,' said the colonel.
'How can I walk alone now at night?' 'The Princess confirmed it.' 'I will send Parsha.'
Kitty saw that Varenka had a hard time holding a smile when she said that she needed to be seen out.
'No, I always walk alone, and nothing ever happens to me,' she said, taking a hat.
And by kissing Kitty again and never saying what was important, a bright step, with notes under her arm, she hid in half the darkness of the summer night, carrying her secret about what was important and what gave her this enviable calm and dignity.
Kitty also met Mrs. Stahl, and this, along with her friendship with Varenka, not only had a strong influence on her, but comforted her in her grief.
She found this comfort in the fact that this introduction opened up a whole new world that had nothing to do with her past, a lofty, beautiful world from whose height it was possible to look at this past in peace.
What revealed to her was that, apart from the instinctive life that Kitty had so far been given, there was spiritual life.
This life was revealed by religion, but by religion that had nothing to do with that which Kitty knew since childhood and which was expressed in a poor and all-powerful house where acquaintances could be met, and in a study with a father of Slavic texts; it was a religion that was lofty, mysterious, linked to a series of wonderful thoughts and feelings that could not only be believed, because it was so commanded, but could be loved.
Kitty didn't get it out of her mouth.
Madame Stahl spoke to Kitty as a sweet child who you admire as a memory of her youth, and only once mentioned that in all human sorrows, the comfort comes only from love and faith, and that for our compassion Christ is no small sorrow, and immediately translated the conversation into another.
But Kitty in every move, in every word, in every heavenly word, as Kitty called it, the look of her, especially in the history of her life, which she knew through Varenka, learned everything "what was important" and what she still didn't know.
But as lofty as the character of Madame Stahl may be, as touching as her whole story may be, as lofty as her speech may be, Kitty has inadvertently pointed to the characteristics that embarrassed her.
She noticed that when she asked about her family, Madame Stahl smiled contemptiblely, which was disgusted by Christian kindness.
I also noticed that when she found her Catholic priest, Madame Stahl carefully kept her face in the shadow of the Abajoura and especially smiled.
The two comments were negligible, they embarrassed her, and she doubted Madame Stahl.
But at the same time, Varenka, alone, without family, without friends, with sad disappointment, with nothing to wish for, without regret, was the perfect thing Kitty could ever dream of.
In Varenka, she realized that all she had to do was forget herself and love others, and you'll be calm, happy, beautiful.
And that's how Kitty wanted to be.
Now that it was clear what was most important, Kitty was not content to admire it, but immediately the whole soul gave up this new life that opened up to her.
According to Varenka's account of what Madame Stahl and the others she called, Kitty has already drawn up a happy plan for the future.
She, like Mrs. Stahl's niece, Alene, about whom Varenka has told her a lot, will, wherever she lives, search for the poor, help and as many as possible, distribute the Gospel, read the Gospel to the sick, to the criminals, to the dying.
The idea of reading the Gospels to criminals, as Alene did, was particularly appealing to Kitty.
But all these were secret dreams Kitty didn't say to her mother or Varenka.
However, in anticipation of a great deal of planning, Kitty and now, in waters where there were so many sick and unfortunate people, found it easy to apply their new rules, i.e. to imitate Varenka.
At first, the Princess noticed that Kitty was under the strong influence of her enguement, as she called it, to Mrs. Stahl and in particular-- and to Varenka.
She saw that Kitty not only imitates Varenka in her activities, but willingly imitates her in her way of walking, speaking, and blinking her eyes.
But then the Princess noticed that the daughter, no matter how charmed, was undergoing some serious emotional upheaval.
The Princess saw that Kitty read the French Gospel in the evenings, which Mrs. Stahl had given her, which she had never done before; that she avoided social acquaintances and was associated with patients under Varenka's protection, and in particular with one poor family of a sick painter Petrov.
Kitty was apparently proud to be the sister of mercy in this family.
All this was good, and the Princess had nothing to do with it, especially since Petrov's wife was a decent woman and that the princess who had replaced Kitty's activities praised her for calling her a comforter angel.
All of this would have been very good if it hadn't been extravagant.
And the Princess saw her daughter falling into extremes, which she told her.
'Il ne fat jamais rien outsider,' she said.
But her daughter did not answer her; she only thought in her heart that you could not speak of excess in the Christian work.
What kind of excess is there in following a doctrine in which the other cheek is commanded to be set up when hit on one, and to give up the shirt when the kaftan is removed?
But the Princess didn't like it, and she didn't like what she felt anymore, Kitty didn't want to reveal her whole soul to her.
Indeed, Kitty kept her mother from her new ways of thinking and feeling.
She didn't hide them because she didn't respect her mother, because she didn't love her mother, but because it was her mother.
She would have opened them to anyone more than her mother.
'Anna Pavlovna hasn't been with us in a long time,' said the Princess of Petrov. 'I called her.
It's like she's not happy.
'No, I didn't notice, maman,' said Kitty in a flash.
'How long have you been with them?
'We are going to take a walk to the mountains tomorrow,' said Kitty.
'Well, go,' answered the Princess, looking into her daughter's embarrassed face and trying to guess why she was embarrassed.
On the same day, Varenka came to lunch and reported that Anna Pavlovna had decided to go to the mountains tomorrow...
And the Princess noticed that Kitty was blushing again.
'Kiti, have you had any trouble with Petrova? 'The Princess said, when they were alone.' 'Why did she stop sending children and coming to us?
Kitty replied that there was nothing between them and that she was determined not to understand why Anna Pavlovna seemed to be displeased with her.
Kitty answered the perfect truth. She didn't know the reason for Anna Pavlovna's change, but she knew.
She knew something she couldn't tell her mother she didn't tell herself.
It was one of those things you know, but you can't even tell yourself; it's so scary and embarrassing to be wrong.
Again and again, she recaptured her entire relationship with this family.
She recalled the naive joy expressed in Anna Pavlovna's round-the-air good-looking face at their meetings; recalled their secret negotiations about the sick, plotting to distract him from the work that he was forbidden to do, to take him out; and the affection of the little boy who called her "my Kitty" who didn't want to go to bed without her.
How good it was!
Then she remembered Petrov's skinny skinny figure with his long neck in his brown jacket; his rare curly hair, questionable, scary at first for Kitty's blue eyes, and his painful efforts to seem bright and lively in her presence.
She remembered her efforts at the outset to overcome the disgust she felt for him, as for all the cheesy ones, and the efforts she had made to tell him.
She remembered this shy, empathetic look that he looked at her with, and the strange feeling of compassion and awkwardness and then the consciousness of her goodness that she felt at the time.
How good it was!
But it was the first time.
Now, a few days ago, everything suddenly went wrong.
Anna Pavlovna met Kitty with pretense courtesy and watched her and her husband all the time.
Was that touching joy on her approach the cause of Anna Pavlovna's cooling?
"Yeah," she remembered, "something non-natural in Anna Pavlovna and very different from her kindness when she said three days with annoyance, "that everyone was waiting for you, didn't want to drink coffee without you, though it was awful."
"Yeah, maybe, and it hurt her when I gave him the blanket.
It's all so simple, but he's taken it so embarrassingly, he's been thanking me for so long, it's embarrassing, too.
And then this portrait is mine, which he did so well.
Above all, that look is embarrassed and tender!
Yeah, yeah, that's right!-- I told Kitty with horror. 'No, it can't, it can't be!
He's so pathetic!" 'She said to herself after that.'
That doubt poisoned the beauty of her new life.
Just before the end of the course, Prince Scherbatsky, who had travelled after Karlsbad to Baden and Kissingen to meet Russian acquaintances to gather Russian spirit, he said, returned to his own.
The eyes of the Prince and Princess on foreign life were quite different.
The Princess found everything beautiful and, despite her firm position in Russian society, tried abroad to be like a European lady than she was, because she was a Russian lady, and she pretended to be somewhat uncomfortable.
On the other hand, the Prince found all the bad things to be abroad, burdened with European life, held on to his Russian habits, and deliberately tried to express himself abroad as a less European than he was in fact.
The prince returned with a thinner skin on his cheeks, but in the most merry mood of the spirit.
Funness increased when he saw Kitty recovering completely.
The news of Kitty &apos; s friendship with Ms. Stahl and Varenka and the Princess &apos; s observation of some change that had taken place in Kitty had embarrassed the Prince and led him to a normal sense of jealousy for everything his daughter had attracted to besides him, and the fear that his daughter would not leave his influence in areas beyond his reach.
But these unpleasant news drowned in the sea of kindness and joy that had always been in it and had been especially reinforced by the Carlsbad waters.
On the other day, the prince, in his long coat, with his Russian wrinkles and his swollen cheeks, with his smoldering collars, went with his daughter to the water in the most joyful position of spirit.
The morning was beautiful; the tidy, hilarious houses with saddles, the view of red-faced, red-handed, beer - filled German maids, and the bright sun made the heart rejoice; but the closer they approached the waters, the more the sick met, and their view seemed even worse among the normal conditions of well - organized German life.
Kitty wasn't struck by the opposite.
The bright sun, the merry glitter of greens, the sound of music was for her the natural frame of all those familiar faces and the changes to the deterioration or improvement that she was watching; but for the Prince, the light and glitter of June morning and the sound of the orchestra playing a fashioned fun waltz, and especially the view of the big maids seemed to be indecent and ugly in joining with those gathered together with all of Europe, was despondent by the moving dead.
Despite his sense of pride and as a return to youth when his beloved daughter was walking in his hand, he now felt embarrassed and ashamed of his strong walk, for his large, fat - covered dicks.
He felt almost undressed in society.
'Imagine, introduce me to your new friends,' he said to her daughter, shaking her hand. 'I and this nasty Soden of yours fell in love for what he did to you.
It's just sad. It's sad.
Who's that?
Keith used to call him those familiar and strange faces they met.
At the entrance to the garden, they met a blind m-me Berthe with a guide, and the prince rejoiced at the smug expression of an old French woman when she heard Kitty's voice.
At once, she spoke to him with the French extenuation of courtesy, praising him for having such a beautiful daughter, and looking up to Kitty's heaven and calling her a treasure, a pen and a comforter angel.
'Well, she is the second angel,' said the prince smiling. 'She calls the angel the first mademoiselle Varenka.
'Oh! M-lle Varenka -- this is a real angel, allez -- picked up m-me Berthe.
They met Varenka at the gallery.
She rushed to meet them, carrying an elegant red purse.
'Here comes Dad!' said Kitty to her.
Varenka made it simple and natural, just like everything she did, the movement, the middle between the bow and the sitting, and immediately spoke to the prince, as she spoke to everyone, unbroken and simple.
'Of course I know you, I know you very much,' said the prince with a smile, by which Kitty was happy to learn that her friend liked her father. 'Why are you in such a hurry?'
'Maman is here,' she said, turning to Kitty. 'She stayed up all night, and the doctor advised her to leave.
I'm carrying her job.
'This is the angel number one!' said the prince when Varenka left.
Kitty saw that he wanted to laugh at Varenka, but that he couldn't do it because he liked Varenka.
'Well, we shall all see your friends,' he added, 'and Madame Stahl, if she wishes to know me. a burning fire of ridicule in the eyes of the Prince at the mention of Madame Stahl.
'I knew her husband and her a little before she signed up.
'What is a pyetist, Dad? 'I dropped Kitty, already terrified that what she valued so highly in Mrs. Stahl had a name.
'I don't know very well myself.
All I know is that she thanks God for everything, for all her misery, and for her husband's death, for God's gratitude.
Well, that's funny, 'cause they didn't live well. 'Who is this?
What a pathetic face!' he asked, when he noticed a small sick man sitting on a bench in a brown coat and white pantallons making strange folds on the meatless bones of his legs.
This gentleman raised his straw hat above his curly, rare hair, opening a tall, painfully reddish forehead from the hat.
'This is Petrov, the painter,' said Kitty, red. 'And this is his wife,' she added, pointing to Anna Pavlovna, who, as if on purpose, at the same time as they were approaching, followed a child running off the road.
'How pathetic, and how cute his face is!' said the prince. 'Why didn't you come?
Is there something he wanted to tell you?
'Well, let's go,' said Kitty, turning with determination. 'How are your health these days?' 'She asked Petrov.
Petrov stood up, leaning on the stick, and looked shyly at the prince.
'This is my daughter,' said the prince. 'Let me be familiar.
The painter bowed and smiled, opening strangely shiny white teeth.
'We waited for you yesterday, Princess,' he said.
He shuddered, saying that, and in repeating that movement, he tried to show that he did it on purpose.
'I wanted to come, but Varenka said that Anna Pavlovna sent me to say you wouldn't go.
'How can we not go?' 'Bloodly, and immediately coughed,' said Petrov, looking for the wife's eyes. 'Aneta, Aneta!' he said loudly, and on his thin white neck, like ropes, fat veins were stretched.
Anna Pavlovna came.
'How did you send the Princess to tell her we wouldn't go! 'When he lost his voice, he whispered annoyingly to her.
'Hello, Princess! 'Anna Pavlovna said with a fake smile so different from her previous treatment. 'It is very nice to meet you,' she turned to the Prince. 'You've been waiting a long time, Prince.
'How did you send the Princess to tell her we wouldn't go?' 'Hryly whispered yet again to the painter yet more angry, apparently angry even more by the fact that his voice was changing him and he could not give his speech the expression he wanted.'
'Oh, my God!
I thought we weren't going,' the wife answered with shame.
'How, when...' he coughed and waved his hand. The prince lifted his hat and left with his daughter.
'Oh, ooh! 'He took a heavy breath,' said the poor ones!
'Yes, Dad,' said Kitty. 'But we need to know that they have three children, no maids, and almost no money.'
He's getting something from the Academy,' she's been telling a lot, trying to silence the excitement she's had as a result of Anna Pavlovna's strange attitude towards her.
'Oh, here comes Madame Stahl,' said Kitty, pointing to a pram in which there was something in it, covered with pillows, in something gray and blue, under the umbrella.
It was Ms. Stahl.
Behind her was a dark, big German worker riding her.
There was a blonde Swedish Count who was known by the name of Kitty.
Several sick people slowed by the pram, looking at this lady like something extraordinary.
The Prince approached her. And immediately, in his eyes, Kitty noticed the ridicule of her light.
He went up to Madame Stahl and spoke in that excellent French language, which so few people now speak, very politely and nicely.
'I don't know if you'll remember me, but I have to remind myself to thank you for your kindness to my daughter,' he said to her, taking off her hat and not putting it on.
'The Prince Alexander Shcherbatsky,' said Madame Stahl, raising her heavenly eyes to him, in which Kitty noticed displeasure. 'Rejoice to meet you.
I loved your daughter so much.
'Cause your health isn't good?
'I am used to it,' said Madame Stahl, and introduced the Prince to the Swedish count.
'And you have changed very little,' said the prince. 'I had no honour to see you for ten or eleven years.
'Yes, God gives a cross and gives strength to carry it.
You often wonder what this life is all about...
On the other side! 'She was displeased by Varenka, who had not so wrapped her feet with a stick.'
'To do good, perhaps,' said the prince, laughing with his eyes.
'It is not for us to judge,' said Ms. Stahl, noting the shade of expression on the Prince's face. 'So you'll send me this book, dear Count?
"Thank you very much," she turned to the young Swede.
'Ah! 'The prince cried out, seeing a Moscow colonel standing by, and bowing to Mrs. Stahl, retreated with his daughter and a Moscow colonel joining them.
'This is our aristocracy, Prince! 'The Moscow colonel, who was in a claim against Mrs. Stahl for not knowing him, said with a desire to be ridiculous.
'It is the same,' answered the prince.
'Did you know her before you were sick, Prince, that is, before she lay down?'
'Yes. She lied down in front of me,' said the prince.
'They say she hasn't stood up in ten years.
'It doesn't rise because it's a short foot.
It's a very bad setup.
'Dad, no way! 'It was Kitty's strong objection. 'The Varenka loves her.
And then she does so much good!
Ask anyone you want!
Everyone knows her and Alle Steel.
'Maybe,' he said, shaking her hand with an elbow. 'But it's better when you make someone ask, no one knows.'
Kitty did not shut up because she had nothing to say; but neither did they want to reveal their secret thoughts.
The strange thing, though she was so prepared to disobey her father's eyes, to deny him access to her holy place, she felt that the divine image of Mrs. Stahl, which she had worn in her soul for a month, had disappeared irrevocably as a figure made out of an abandoned dress, disappeared when you realized how that dress was.
There's one short-legged woman who's lying there because she's bad, and she's tormenting the unrequited Varenka because she's not putting it up like that.
And no effort of imagination could ever be made to bring back the former Madame Stahl.
XXXV
The Prince passed on his joyous spirit and his household, and his acquaintances, and even the German host who had the Sherbits.
When he returned with Kitty from the waters and invited both the colonel and Mary Evgenevna and Varenka to join him, the prince ordered him to carry the table and the chairs into the garden, under the chestnut, and to cover the breakfast.
And the master and the servants came to life under the influence of his joy.
They knew his generosity, and after half an hour, a sick hamburg doctor, living upstairs, enviedly looked out the window at this fun Russian company of healthy people gathered under chestnuts.
Under a trembling circle of leaves, covered with white tablecloths and caffeine, bread, butter, cheese, cold wild table, the Princess sat in a tattoo of purple ribbons, handing out cups and tartins.
The prince sat on the other end, eating heavily and talking loudly and having fun.
The Prince spread his shopping, his cutting chests, his turquoise, the cutters of all kinds, which he had bought on all waters, and gave them to everyone, including Lischen, the maiden, and to the master with whom he made jokes in his comic bad German, assuring him that not the waters had cured Kitty, but his good food, especially the soup with prunes.
The Princess laughed at her husband for his Russian habits, but she was as excited and happy as she had never been in the waters.
The colonel, as always, smiled at the Prince's jokes; but about Europe, which he carefully studied, he thought he held the Princess's side.
The good Mary Evgenyevna was laughing at everything the funny prince said, and Varenka, which Kitty had never seen before, was disillusioned by the faint but reported laughter that provoked the Prince's jokes in her.
All this was fun for Kitty, but she couldn't help being concerned.
She could not solve the task that her father had inadvertently given her with her merry eyes on her friends and the life she loved so much.
This has been accompanied by a change in her relationship with Petrov, which has now become so obvious and unpleasant.
Everyone had fun, but Kitty couldn't have been fun, and it hurt her even more.
She felt the way she felt when she was a child when she was locked in her room under punishment and listened to her sisters laughing.
'Well, what did you buy this abyss for?' 'Said the Princess, smiling and serving her husband a cup of coffee.'
'You're going to walk, well, you're going to the shop and they're asking you to buy 'Earlaucht, Excellent, Dumblaht.'
Well, as they say, "Durhlaucht," I can't say no to ten talers.
'It's just boredom,' said the Princess.
'Of course I am bored.
So boring, Mother, you don't know where to go.
'How can I miss you, Prince?
So much interesting now in Germany,' said Mary Evgenyevna.
'I know all the interesting things: prune soup I know, pea sausage I know.
I know everything.
'No, but as you wish, Prince, their institutions are interesting,' said the colonel.
'What's so interesting?
They're all as happy as copper chips: they've all been won.
Well, what am I supposed to be happy about?
I didn't beat anyone, but just take off your boots, and put them outside the door yourself.
Get up in the morning, get dressed now, go to the tea salon, you bad drink.
Whether it's home or not!
You wake up in a hurry, you're mad at something, you're gonna talk, you're gonna remember, you're gonna think it over, you're not in a hurry.
'And time -- money, you forget it,' said the colonel.
'What a time!
It's another time you're gonna give me half a month, or you're not gonna get any money in half an hour.
Isn't that right, Katenka?
What are you, so boring?
'I am nothing.
'Where are you going?
Sit still,' he turned to Varenka.
'I have to go home,' said Varenka, standing up and laughing again.
After recovering, she said goodbye and went into the house to get her hat.
Kitty went after her. Even Varenka seemed like a friend now.
She wasn't worse, but she was different than the one she once imagined.
'Oh, I haven't laughed so much in a long time!' said Varenka, collecting an umbrella and a bag. 'What a sweetheart he is, your dad!
Kitty didn't say anything.
'When will I see you?' 'Ask Varenka.
'Maman wanted to visit Petrov.
You won't be there? 'Kiti said, testing Varenka.
'I will be,' replied Varenka. 'They're going to leave, so I promised I'd help you get it done.'
'Well, I'll come.
'No, what do you want?
'Why? Why? Why? 'In open eyes, Kitty spoke, taking to keep Varenka behind her umbrella. 'No, wait, why?
'That's it; your dad came, and then they're embarrassed of you.
'No, you tell me, why don't you want me to visit Petrov often?
You don't want to, do you?
Why?
'I didn't say that,' said Varenka calmly.
'No, please tell me!
'Is it all to speak?' 'Ask Varenka.
'That's it, that's it!' got Kitty.
'There is nothing special, except that Michael Alexeyevich (so called the painter) had previously wanted to leave early, and now he does not want to leave,' said Varenka, smiling.
'Well! Well! 'Hurrying Kitty, looking down on Varenka.'
'Well, for some reason Anna Pavlovna said that he didn't want you here.
Of course it wasn't right, but that's what got you into a fight.
And you know how annoying these patients are.
Kitty was increasingly frowning, silent, and Varenka spoke alone, trying to calm her down and seeing the explosion, she did not know what -- tears or words.
'It is better that you do not go...'
And you understand, don't be offended...
'And it is for me, and it is for me!' said Kitty quickly, grabbing an umbrella out of Varenka's hands and looking past her friend's eye.
Varenka wanted to smile at her friend's childish anger, but she was afraid to insult her.
'What's the deal?
I don't understand,' she said.
'It's all about pretending, 'because it's all made up, not from the heart.'
What did I care about someone else?
And it turns out that I'm the cause of the fight and that I was doing something that no one asked me to do.
'Cause it's all pretending! pretending! pretending!
'What is the purpose of pretending?' 'Silently said Varenka.
'Oh, that's so stupid, it's disgusting!
I didn't need any...